Mississippi statutes. Title 25. Public Officers and Employees; Public Records
Article 1. State Employees Life and Health Insurance Plan.

§ 25-15-1.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1988, ch. 479, § 7, eff from and after July 1, 1988.

[Codes, 1942, § 5834-131; Laws, 1971, ch. 523, § 1; 1984, ch. 488, § 142]

§ 25-15-3.
Definitions.

For the purposes of this article, the words and phrases used herein shall have the following meanings:

“Employee” means a person who works full time for the State of Mississippi and receives his compensation in a direct payment from a department, agency or institution of the state government and any person who works full time for any school district, community/junior college, public library or university-based program authorized under Section 37-23-31 for deaf, aphasic and emotionally disturbed children or any regular nonstudent bus driver. This shall include legislators, employees of the legislative branch and the judicial branch of the state and “employees” shall include full-time salaried judges and full-time district attorneys and their staff and full-time compulsory school attendance officers. For the purposes of this article, any “employee” making contributions to the State of Mississippi retirement plan shall be considered a full-time employee.

“Department” means the Department of Finance and Administration.

“Plan” means the State and School Employees Life and Health Insurance Plan created under this article.

“Fund” means the State and School Employees Insurance Fund set up under this article.

“Retiree” means any employee retired under the Mississippi retirement plan.

“Board” means the State and School Employees Health Insurance Management Board created under Section 25-15-303.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5834-132; Laws, 1971, ch. 523, § 2; Laws, 1972, ch. 537, § 1; Laws, 1984, ch. 488, § 143; Laws, 1999, ch. 511, § 1; Laws, 2002, ch. 636, § 4; Laws, 2016, ch. 397, § 19, eff from and after July 1, 2016.

§ 25-15-5.
Powers and duties of department.

The board shall administer the plan and is authorized to adopt and promulgate rules and regulations for its administration, subject to the terms and limitations contained in this article.

The board shall develop a five-year strategic plan for the insurance plan established by Section 25-15-3 et seq. The strategic plan shall address, but not be limited to:

Changing trends in the health care industry, and how they effect delivery of services to members of the plan.

Alternative service delivery systems.

Any foreseeable problems with the present system of delivering and administering health care benefits in Mississippi.

The development of options and recommendations for changes in the plan.

To carry out the requirements of subsection (2) of this section, the board may conduct formal research, including questionnaires and attitudinal surveys of members’ needs and preferences with respect to service delivery.

After the board has complied with all provisions of Section 25-15-9 regarding the establishment of the plan, it shall be responsible for fully disclosing to plan members the provisions of the plan. Such disclosure shall consist of the dissemination of educational material on the plan and any proposed changes thereto. The board shall provide members with complete educational materials at least thirty (30) days before the date upon which the plan’s members must select a plan option for health care services. The board shall further use the resources of the Mississippi Authority for Educational Television or other state agency, university or college to provide information on proposed changes. The board may also use other state-owned media, as well as public service announcements on private media to disseminate information regarding proposed changes in the plan.

The board shall develop and make available for public review at its offices a comprehensive plan document which documents all benefits for which members of the plan created by Section 25-15-3 et seq. are eligible. This document shall be typed and maintained also at the offices of any administrator contracted with in accordance with Section 25-15-301.

The board may enter into contracts with accountants, actuaries and other persons from the private sector whose skills are necessary to carry out the purposes of Section 25-15-3 et seq.

Before the board enters into any contract for services as provided in paragraph (a) of this subsection, the board shall first determine that the services are required, and that the staff of the board and personnel of other state agencies are not sufficiently experienced to provide the services.

If the service is to be rendered for a period of in excess of six (6) months, the board shall seek and obtain bids for the service in a manner identical to that provided for in Section 25-15-301, subsection (1)(a) and (b) except for those provisions which specifically state criteria which are applicable only to third-party administrators contracted with in accordance with Section 25-15-3 et seq.

The board is also authorized to procure legal services if it deems these services to be necessary to carry out its responsibilities under Section 25-15-3 et seq.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5834-133; Laws, 1971, ch. 523, § 3; Laws, 1984, ch. 488, § 144; Laws, 1985, ch. 525, § 33; Laws, 1999, ch. 511, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 1999.

§ 25-15-7.
Exclusions.

Such health insurance shall not include expense incurred by or on account of an individual prior to July 1, 1972, as to him; dental care and treatment, except dental surgery and appliances to the extent necessary for the correction of damage caused by accidental injury while covered by the plan, or as a direct result of disease covered by the plan; eyeglasses, hearing aids, and examinations for the prescription or fitting thereof; cosmetic surgery or treatment, except to the extent necessary for correction of damage by accidental injury while covered by the plan or as a direct result of disease covered by the plan; services received in a hospital owned or operated by the United States government for which no charge is made; services received for injury or sickness due to war or any act of war, whether declared or undeclared, which war or act of war shall have occurred after July 1, 1972; expense for which the individual is not required to make payment; expenses to the extent of benefits provided under any employer group plan other than this plan, in which the state participates in the cost thereof; and such other expenses as may be excluded by regulations of the board.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5834-134; Laws, 1971, ch. 523, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 1972.

§ 25-15-9.
Formulation of state employees health insurance plan; benefits.

The board shall design a plan of health insurance for state employees that provides benefits for semiprivate rooms in addition to other incidental coverages that the board deems necessary. The amount of the coverages shall be in such reasonable amount as may be determined by the board to be adequate, after due consideration of current health costs in Mississippi. The plan shall also include major medical benefits in such amounts as the board determines. The plan shall provide for coverage for telemedicine services as provided in Section 83-9-351. The board is also authorized to accept bids for such alternate coverage and optional benefits as the board deems proper. The board is authorized to accept bids for surgical services that include assistance in locating a surgeon, setting up initial consultation, travel, a negotiated single case rate bundle and payment for orthopedic, spine, bariatric, cardiovascular and general surgeries. The surgical services may only utilize surgeons and facilities located in the State of Mississippi unless otherwise provided by the board. Any contract for alternative coverage and optional benefits shall be awarded by the board after it has carefully studied and evaluated the bids and selected the best and most cost-effective bid. The board may reject all of the bids; however, the board shall notify all bidders of the rejection and shall actively solicit new bids if all bids are rejected. The board may employ or contract for such consulting or actuarial services as may be necessary to formulate the plan, and to assist the board in the preparation of specifications and in the process of advertising for the bids for the plan. Those contracts shall be solicited and entered into in accordance with Section 25-15-5. The board shall keep a record of all persons, agents and corporations who contract with or assist the board in preparing and developing the plan. The board in a timely manner shall provide copies of this record to the members of the advisory council created in this section and those legislators, or their designees, who may attend meetings of the advisory council. The board shall provide copies of this record in the solicitation of bids for the administration or servicing of the self-insured program. Each person, agent or corporation that, during the previous fiscal year, has assisted in the development of the plan or employed or compensated any person who assisted in the development of the plan, and that bids on the administration or servicing of the plan, shall submit to the board a statement accompanying the bid explaining in detail its participation with the development of the plan. This statement shall include the amount of compensation paid by the bidder to any such employee during the previous fiscal year. The board shall make all such information available to the members of the advisory council and those legislators, or their designees, who may attend meetings of the advisory council before any action is taken by the board on the bids submitted. The failure of any bidder to fully and accurately comply with this paragraph shall result in the rejection of any bid submitted by that bidder or the cancellation of any contract executed when the failure is discovered after the acceptance of that bid. The board is authorized to promulgate rules and regulations to implement the provisions of this subsection.

The board shall develop plans for the insurance plan authorized by this section in accordance with the provisions of Section 25-15-5.

Any corporation, association, company or individual that contracts with the board for the third-party claims administration of the self-insured plan shall prepare and keep on file an explanation of benefits for each claim processed. The explanation of benefits shall contain such information relative to each processed claim that the board deems necessary, and, at a minimum, each explanation shall provide the claimant’s name, claim number, provider number, provider name, service dates, type of services, amount of charges, amount allowed to the claimant and reason codes. The information contained in the explanation of benefits shall be available for inspection upon request by the board. The board shall have access to all claims information utilized in the issuance of payments to employees and providers.

There is created an advisory council to advise the board in the formulation of the State and School Employees Health Insurance Plan. The council shall be composed of the State Insurance Commissioner, or his designee, an employee-representative of the institutions of higher learning appointed by the board of trustees thereof, an employee-representative of the Department of Transportation appointed by the director thereof, an employee-representative of the Department of Revenue appointed by the Commissioner of Revenue, an employee-representative of the Mississippi Department of Health appointed by the State Health Officer, an employee-representative of the Mississippi Department of Corrections appointed by the Commissioner of Corrections, and an employee-representative of the Department of Human Services appointed by the Executive Director of Human Services, two (2) certificated public school administrators appointed by the State Board of Education, two (2) certificated classroom teachers appointed by the State Board of Education, a noncertificated school employee appointed by the State Board of Education and a community/junior college employee appointed by the Mississippi Community College Board.

The Lieutenant Governor may designate the Secretary of the Senate, the Chairman of the Senate Appropriations Committee, the Chairman of the Senate Education Committee and the Chairman of the Senate Insurance Committee, and the Speaker of the House of Representatives may designate the Clerk of the House, the Chairman of the House Appropriations Committee, the Chairman of the House Education Committee and the Chairman of the House Insurance Committee, to attend any meeting of the State and School Employees Insurance Advisory Council. The appointing authorities may designate an alternate member from their respective houses to serve when the regular designee is unable to attend the meetings of the council. Those designees shall have no jurisdiction or vote on any matter within the jurisdiction of the council. For attending meetings of the council, the legislators shall receive per diem and expenses, which shall be paid from the contingent expense funds of their respective houses in the same amounts as provided for committee meetings when the Legislature is not in session; however, no per diem and expenses for attending meetings of the council will be paid while the Legislature is in session. No per diem and expenses will be paid except for attending meetings of the council without prior approval of the proper committee in their respective houses.

No change in the terms of the State and School Employees Health Insurance Plan may be made effective unless the board, or its designee, has provided notice to the State and School Employees Health Insurance Advisory Council and has called a meeting of the council at least fifteen (15) days before the effective date of the change. If the State and School Employees Health Insurance Advisory Council does not meet to advise the board on the proposed changes, the changes to the plan shall become effective at such time as the board has informed the council that the changes shall become effective.

Medical benefits for retired employees and dependents under age sixty-five (65) years and not eligible for Medicare benefits.For employees who retire before July 1, 2005, and for employees retiring due to work-related disability under the Public Employees’ Retirement System, the same health insurance coverage as for all other active employees and their dependents shall be available to retired employees and all dependents under age sixty-five (65) years who are not eligible for Medicare benefits, the level of benefits to be the same level as for all other active participants. For employees who retire on or after July 1, 2005, and not retiring due to work-related disability under the Public Employees’ Retirement System, the same health insurance coverage as for all other active employees and their dependents shall be available to those retiring employees and all dependents under age sixty-five (65) years who are not eligible for Medicare benefits only if the retiring employees were participants in the State and School Employees Health Insurance Plan for four (4) years or more before their retirement, the level of benefits to be the same level as for all other active participants. This section will apply to those employees who retire due to one hundred percent (100%) medical disability as well as those employees electing early retirement.

Medical benefits for retired employees and dependents over age sixty-five (65) years or otherwise eligible for Medicare benefits.For employees who retire before July 1, 2005, and for employees retiring due to work-related disability under the Public Employees’ Retirement System, the health insurance coverage available to retired employees over age sixty-five (65) years or otherwise eligible for Medicare benefits, and all dependents over age sixty-five (65) years or otherwise eligible for Medicare benefits, shall be the major medical coverage. For employees retiring on or after July 1, 2005, and not retiring due to work-related disability under the Public Employees’ Retirement System, the health insurance coverage described in this paragraph (e) shall be available to those retiring employees only if they were participants in the State and School Employees Health Insurance Plan for four (4) years or more and are over age sixty-five (65) years or otherwise eligible for Medicare benefits, and to all dependents over age sixty-five (65) years or otherwise eligible for Medicare benefits. Benefits shall be reduced by Medicare benefits as though the Medicare benefits were the base plan.

All covered individuals shall be assumed to have full Medicare coverage, Parts A and B; and any Medicare payments under both Parts A and B shall be computed to reduce benefits payable under this plan.

Lifetime maximum: The lifetime maximum amount of benefits payable under the health insurance plan for each participant is Two Million Dollars ($2,000,000.00).

Nonduplication of benefits – reduction of benefits by Title XIX benefits: When benefits would be payable under more than one (1) group plan, benefits under those plans will be coordinated to the extent that the total benefits under all plans will not exceed the total expenses incurred.

Benefits for hospital or surgical or medical benefits shall be reduced by any similar benefits payable in accordance with Title XIX of the Social Security Act or under any amendments thereto, or any implementing legislation.

Benefits forhospital or surgical or medical benefits shall be reduced by any similarbenefits payable by workers’ compensation.

No health care benefits under the state plan shall restrict coverage for medically appropriate treatment prescribed by a physician and agreed to by a fully informed insured, or if the insured lacks legal capacity to consent by a person who has legal authority to consent on his or her behalf, based on an insured’s diagnosis with a terminal condition. As used in this paragraph, “terminal condition” means any aggressive malignancy, chronic end-stage cardiovascular or cerebral vascular disease, or any other disease, illness or condition which physician diagnoses as terminal.

Not later than January 1, 2016, the state health plan shall not require a higher co-payment, deductible or coinsurance amount for patient-administered anti-cancer medications, including, but not limited to, those orally administered or self-injected, than it requires for anti-cancer medications that are injected or intravenously administered by a health care provider, regardless of the formulation or benefit category determination by the plan. For the purposes of this paragraph, the term “anti-cancer medications” has the meaning as defined in Section 83-9-24.

Schedule of life insurance benefits – group term: The amount of term life insurance for each active employee of a department, agency or institution of the state government shall not be in excess of One Hundred Thousand Dollars ($100,000.00), or twice the amount of the employee’s annual wage to the next highest One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00), whichever may be less, but in no case less than Thirty Thousand Dollars ($30,000.00), with a like amount for accidental death and dismemberment on a twenty-four-hour basis. The plan will further contain a premium waiver provision if a covered employee becomes totally and permanently disabled before age sixty-five (65) years. Employees retiring after June 30, 1999, shall be eligible to continue life insurance coverage in an amount of Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00), Ten Thousand Dollars ($10,000.00) or Twenty Thousand Dollars ($20,000.00) into retirement.

Effective October 1, 1999, schedule of life insurance benefits – group term: The amount of term life insurance for each active employee of any school district, community/junior college, public library or university-based program authorized under Section 37-23-31 for deaf, aphasic and emotionally disturbed children or any regular nonstudent bus driver shall not be in excess of One Hundred Thousand Dollars ($100,000.00), or twice the amount of the employee’s annual wage to the next highest One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00), whichever may be less, but in no case less than Thirty Thousand Dollars ($30,000.00), with a like amount for accidental death and dismemberment on a twenty-four-hour basis. The plan will further contain a premium waiver provision if a covered employee of any school district, community/junior college, public library or university-based program authorized under Section 37-23-31 for deaf, aphasic and emotionally disturbed children or any regular nonstudent bus driver becomes totally and permanently disabled before age sixty-five (65) years. Employees of any school district, community/junior college, public library or university-based program authorized under Section 37-23-31 for deaf, aphasic and emotionally disturbed children or any regular nonstudent bus driver retiring after September 30, 1999, shall be eligible to continue life insurance coverage in an amount of Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00), Ten Thousand Dollars ($10,000.00) or Twenty Thousand Dollars ($20,000.00) into retirement.

Any eligible employee who on March 1, 1971, was participating in a group life insurance program that has provisions different from those included in this article and for which the State of Mississippi was paying a part of the premium may, at his discretion, continue to participate in that plan. The employee shall pay in full all additional costs, if any, above the minimum program established by this article. Under no circumstances shall any individual who begins employment with the state after March 1, 1971, be eligible for the provisions of this subsection.

The board may offer medical savings accounts as defined in Section 71-9-3 as a plan option.

Any premium differentials, differences in coverages, discounts determined by risk or by any other factors shall be uniformly applied to all active employees participating in the insurance plan. It is the intent of the Legislature that the state contribution to the plan be the same for each employee throughout the state.

On October 1, 1999, any school district, community/junior college district or public library may elect to remain with an existing policy or policies of group life insurance with an insurance company approved by the State and School Employees Health Insurance Management Board, in lieu of participation in the State and School Life Insurance Plan. On or after July 1, 2004, until October 1, 2004, any school district, community/junior college district or public library may elect to choose a policy or policies of group life insurance existing on October 1, 1999, with an insurance company approved by the State and School Employees Health Insurance Management Board in lieu of participation in the State and School Life Insurance Plan. The state’s contribution of up to fifty percent (50%) of the active employee’s premium under the State and School Life Insurance Plan may be applied toward the cost of coverage for full-time employees participating in the approved life insurance company group plan. For purposes of this subsection (7), “life insurance company group plan” means a plan administered or sold by a private insurance company. After October 1, 1999, the board may assess charges in addition to the existing State and School Life Insurance Plan rates to such employees as a condition of enrollment in the State and School Life Insurance Plan. In order for any life insurance company group plan to be approved by the State and School Employees Health Insurance Management Board under this subsection (7), it shall meet the following criteria:

The insurance company offering the group life insurance plan shall be rated “A-” or better by A.M. Best state insurance rating service and be licensed as an admitted carrier in the State of Mississippi by the Mississippi Department of Insurance.

The insurance company group life insurance plan shall provide the same life insurance, accidental death and dismemberment insurance and waiver of premium benefits as provided in the State and School Life Insurance Plan.

The insurance company group life insurance plan shall be fully insured, and no form of self-funding life insurance by the company shall be approved.

The insurance company group life insurance plan shall have one (1) composite rate per One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) of coverage for active employees regardless of age and one (1) composite rate per One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) of coverage for all retirees regardless of age or type of retiree.

The insurance company and its group life insurance plan shall comply with any administrative requirements of the State and School Employees Health Insurance Management Board. If any insurance company providing group life insurance benefits to employees under this subsection (7) fails to comply with any requirements specified in this subsection or any administrative requirements of the board, the state shall discontinue providing funding for the cost of that insurance.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5834-135; Laws, 1971, ch. 523, § 5; Laws, 1972, ch. 537, § 2; Laws, 1976, ch. 477, § 1; Laws, 1980, ch. 341, § 1; Laws, 1981, ch. 324, § 1; Laws, 1984, ch. 488, § 145; Laws, 1987, ch. 427; Laws, 1999, ch. 511, § 3; Laws, 2002, ch. 636, § 5; Laws, 2004, ch. 564, § 2; Laws, 2005, 2nd Ex Sess, ch. 106, § 2; Laws, 2008, ch. 560, § 1; brought forward without change, Laws, 2009, ch. 434, § 2; Laws, 2013, ch. 478, § 3; Laws, 2014, ch. 439, § 2; Laws, 2015, ch. 490, § 2; Laws, 2016, ch. 397, § 20, eff from and after July 1, 2016.

§ 25-15-11.
Contracts of insurance; self insurance; contracts for administration of plan; reports, reviews and audits.

The board is authorized to execute a contract or contracts to provide the benefits under the plan. Such contract or contracts may be executed with one or more corporations or associations licensed to transact life and accident and health insurance business in this state; however, no such contract shall be executed with any corporation, association or company domiciled in any other state except that such corporation, association or company shall meet the conditions and terms for a like contract established by the state of the domicile of such corporation, association or company for a Mississippi corporation, association or company. No corporation, association or company with less than five (5) years’ experience in the life and health field may bid. All of the benefits to be provided under the plan may be included in one or more similar contracts, or the benefits may be classified into different types with each type included under one or more similar contracts issued by the same or different companies.

The board shall supply the statistical information upon which a quotation is to be calculated, upon request, to all carriers licensed in the state. Bids may be accepted at the discretion of the board, and the board shall have the right to adjust rates on an annual basis if the board shall deem such adjustment necessary. The plan for active employees shall be on retention accounting basis, and a separate retention accounting basis shall be used for retired employees. Any additional written information the carrier wishes to submit, supporting the proposed benefits and premium rate, may accompany the proposal. After receiving the proposals, the board shall determine whether to contract with the carrier which has been determined to have submitted the lowest and best bid, or to reject all such bids and receive new proposals.

The board shall authorize any corporation licensed to transact accident and health insurance business in this state issuing any such contract to reinsure portions of such contract with any other such corporation which elected to be a reinsurer and is legally competent to enter into a reinsurance agreement. The board may designate one or more of such corporations as the administering corporation or corporations. Each employee who is covered under any such contract or contracts shall receive a certificate setting forth the benefits to which the employee is entitled thereunder, to whom such benefits shall be payable, to whom claims should be submitted, and summarizing the provisions of the contract principally affecting the employee. Such certificate shall be in lieu of the certificate which the corporation or corporations issuing such contract or contracts would otherwise issue.

The board may, as of the end of any contract year, discontinue any contract or contracts it has executed with any corporation or corporations and replace it or them with a contract or contracts in any other corporation or corporations meeting the requirements of this section.

The board may reject any and all bids and contracts under this section and may elect for the state to become a self-insurer; however, administration and service of any such self-insured program may be contracted to a third party by the board.

Any contract with a third party to administer the plan shall be bid and entered into in accordance with the procedures provided in Section 25-15-301.

By September 30 of each year, the board shall report to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, Senate Insurance Committee, House Insurance Committee, Senate Education Committee, House Education Committee and Joint Legislative Committee on Performance Evaluation and Expenditure Review the condition of the State and School Employees Life and Health Insurance Plan. Such report shall contain for the most recently completed fiscal year, but not be limited to, the following:

The plan’s financial condition at the close of the fiscal year.

The history of yearly claims paid and premiums received for each premium class, including, but not limited to, active employees, dependents and retirees.

The history of loss ratios for the active employees, dependents and retirees premium classes as well as historical trend of such ratios. For the purposes of this section, the term “loss ratios” means claims paid by the plan for each premium class divided by premiums received by the plan for insurance coverage of the members in that premium class.

Budgetary information, including:

A detailed breakdown of all expenditures of the plan, administrative and otherwise, for the most recently completed fiscal year and projected expenditures, administrative and otherwise, for the current and next fiscal year;

A schedule of all contracts, administrative and otherwise, executed for the benefit of the plan during the most recent completed fiscal year and those executed and anticipated for the current fiscal year; and

A description of the processes used by the board to procure all contracts, administrative and otherwise, as well as a description of the scope of services to be provided by each contractor.

Budgetary information shall be provided in a format designated by the Joint Legislative Budget Committee.

The Joint Legislative Budget Committee, Senate Insurance Committee, House Insurance Committee, Senate Education Committee, House Education Committee and Joint Legislative Committee on Performance Evaluation and Expenditure Review may request additional information or reports from the board on an as-needed basis.

Annually, the board shall request, and the Department of Audit shall conduct, a comprehensive audit of the State and School Employees Life and Health Insurance Plan. For purposes of this section, the audit required herein shall be separate and distinct from any audit prepared in conjunction with the development of the Comprehensive Annual Financial Report (CAFR).

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5834-136; Laws, 1971, ch. 523, § 6; Laws, 1972, ch. 527, § 3; Laws, 1976, ch. 477, § 2; Laws, 1977, ch. 494, § 1; Laws, 1980, ch. 341, § 2; Laws, 1984, ch. 488, § 146; Laws, 1992, ch. 568 § 3; Laws, 1994, ch. 615, § 6; Laws, 1995, ch. 554, § 4; Laws, 1999, ch. 511, § 4; Laws, 2002, ch. 636, § 6; Laws, 2016, ch. 397, § 21, eff from and after July 1, 2016.

§ 25-15-13.
Eligibility.

Each eligible employee may participate in the plan by signing up for the plan at the time of employment. Each eligible employee who declines coverage under the plan must sign a waiver of coverage. After acceptance in the plan, the employee may cease his or her participation by filing a specific disclaimer with the board. Forms for this purpose shall be prescribed and issued by the board. All eligible employees will be eligible to participate in the plan on the effective date of the plan or on the date on which they are employed by the state, whichever is later, provided they make the necessary contributions as provided in this article. Spouses of employees, unmarried dependent children from birth to age nineteen (19) years, unmarried dependent children who are full-time students up to age twenty-five (25) years, and physically or mentally handicapped children, regardless of age, are eligible under the plan as of the date the employee becomes eligible. If both spouses are eligible employees who participate in the plan, the benefits shall apply individually to each spouse by virtue of his or her participation in the plan. If those spouses also have one or more eligible dependents participating in the plan, the cost of their dependents shall be calculated at a special family plan rate. The cost for participation by the dependents shall be paid by the spouse who elects to carry such dependents under his or her coverage.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5834-137; Laws, 1971, ch. 523, § 7; Laws, 1972, ch. 537, § 4; Laws, 1984, ch. 488, § 147; Laws, 1999, ch. 511, § 5, eff from and after July 1, 1999.

§ 25-15-14.
Elected state or district officials; participation in plans after leaving office.

Any elected state or district official who does not run for reelection or who is defeated before being entitled to receive a retirement allowance shall be eligible to continue to participate in the State and School Employees Health Insurance Plan under the same conditions and coverages for retired employees.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1990, ch. 375, § 1; Laws, 1999, ch. 511, § 6; Laws, 2002, ch. 636, § 7; Laws, 2016, ch. 397, § 22, eff from and after July 1, 2016.